Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.435

Interns—Effect on full time equivalent staff position limitations.

An agency shall not be deemed to exceed any limitation on full time equivalent staff positions on the basis of intern positions established under RCW 43.06.420.

[ 1985 c 442 s 6.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1985 c 442: See notes following RCW 43.06.410.